Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 1. General Benefits
Any payment on account of sickness or accident disability, or medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability, made by an employer to, or on behalf of, an employee after the expiration of six calendar months following the last calendar month in which the employee worked for such employer.

Any payment made to, or on behalf of, an employee or his or her beneficiary (i) from or to a trust described in Section 401(a) of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code which is exempt from tax under Section 501(a) of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code at the time of such payment unless such payment is made to an employee of the trust as remuneration for services rendered as such employee and not as a beneficiary of the trust, or (ii) under or to an annuity plan which, at the time of such payment, is a plan described in Section 403(a) of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code.

The payment by an employer (without deduction from the remuneration of the employee) of the tax imposed upon an employee under Section 3101 of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code.

Any amounts received from the federal government by members of the National Guard and organized reserve, as drill pay, including longevity pay and allowances.

Provided; that if the definition of “wages” in section 3306 of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act is amended so as to no longer exclude from such definition any or all of the payments or amounts enumerated in subdivisions (12)(A) through (E) of this section, then any or all such payments or amounts shall no longer be excluded from the definition of “wages” under this chapter, effective on a date to coincide with the effective date of such amendment (or amendments) to the Federal Unemployment Tax Act.

Any foster care payments excluded from the definition of gross income under Section 131 of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code.

“Week” means such period or periods of seven consecutive days, as the Board may by regulation prescribe.

“Calendar quarter” means a period of three consecutive calendar months ending on March 31, June 30, September 30, or December 31, or the equivalent thereof as the Board may by regulation prescribe.

An individual’s “weekly benefit amount” with respect to any week means the amount of benefits he or she would be entitled to receive for such week if totally unemployed and eligible for benefits therein.

“Benefit year,” with respect to any individual, means the one-year period beginning with the first day of the week with respect to which the individual first files a valid claim for benefits in accordance with section 1346 of this title, and thereafter the one-year period beginning with the first day of the first week with respect to which the individual next files such a claim for benefits after the termination of his or her last preceding benefit year.
(16) (A) “Benefit year,” with respect to any individual, means the one-year period beginning with the first day of the week with respect to which the individual first files a valid claim for benefits in accordance with section 1346 of this title, and thereafter the one-year period beginning with the first day of the first week with respect to which the individual next files such a claim for benefits after the termination of his or her last preceding benefit year.

[Repealed.]

For benefit years beginning prior to January 3, 1988, the “base period” is the period of 52 weeks ending with the day immediately preceding the first day of a claimant’s benefit year. Such period shall be extended by one week for each week, not to exceed 18, in which the claimant had no earnings because of sickness or disability as certified by a duly licensed physician.
(17) (A) For benefit years beginning prior to January 3, 1988, the “base period” is the period of 52 weeks ending with the day immediately preceding the first day of a claimant’s benefit year. Such period shall be extended by one week for each week, not to exceed 18, in which the claimant had no earnings because of sickness or disability as certified by a duly licensed physician.

For benefit years beginning on January 3, 1988 and subsequent thereto the “base period” shall be the period made up of the first four of the most recently completed five calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of a claimant’s benefit year, and for any individual who fails to meet the eligibility requirements of section 1338 of this title in this base period, the Commissioner shall make a redetermination of entitlement based upon a base period which consists of the last four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of the claimant’s benefit year.

For any individual who fails to qualify for benefits under subdivision (B) of this subdivision, the Commissioner shall make a redetermination of entitlement based upon a base period which consists of the last three completed calendar quarters and all wages paid prior to the effective date of the claimant’s initial claim in the calendar quarter in which the initial claim was filed.

All wages which fall within the “base period” of valid claims under this section shall not be available for reuse in qualifying for any subsequent benefit years under section 1338 or 1318 of this title.

“Institution of higher education” means an educational institution which (A) admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate; (B) is legally authorized in this State to provide a program of education beyond high school; (C) provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor’s or higher degree, or provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, a program of post-graduate or post-doctoral studies, or a program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; and (D) is a public or other nonprofit institution. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions, all colleges and universities in this State are institutions of higher education for purposes of this chapter.

“Hospital” means an institution which has been licensed, certified, or approved by the State Board of Health as a hospital, or an institution which is operated by the State of Vermont or any of its instrumentalities as a hospital.

“Rate year” means the period beginning on July 1 of a year and ending on June 30 of the following year.

“Bona fide employer” means the federal government, state governments and political subdivisions of state governments, railroads, tax exempt nonprofit organizations, established agricultural employers, employers liable under the unemployment compensation laws of this State, and an employer who has been assigned an employer identification number by the U.S. Internal Revenue Service.

“Rounding.” Notwithstanding any other provisions of this law to the contrary, any amount of unemployment compensation payable to any individual for any week if not an even dollar amount, shall be rounded to the next lower full dollar amount.

“Valid claim” means a claim for benefits filed by an individual who, at the time of filing the claim, has had sufficient wages in employment with an employer or employers to qualify for benefits pursuant to section 1338 of this title. The filing of a valid claim is a prerequisite to the making of a determination of an individual’s eligibility for benefits under section 1343 of this title and a determination of an individual’s disqualification for benefits under section 1344 of this title.

“Self-employment”:

Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (24), an individual shall be deemed “self-employed” or “engaged in self-employment” in any week during which he or she is engaged, not in the employ of another, in the formation, development, or operation of a trade, business, enterprise, profession, or any other activity which he or she has undertaken for the purpose of producing income and which is in the form of a sole proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, or other similar entity.

An individual who is able to work and available for full-time work shall not be deemed to be self-employed or engaged in self-employment solely by reason of continued participation without substantial change during a period of unemployment in any activity undertaken while customarily employed by an employer in full-time work (whether or not such work constituted employment) and continued subsequent to separation from such work when such activity is not engaged in as a primary source of livelihood. Earnings from such a sideline activity shall not constitute wages or disqualifying income for unemployment purposes.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 10

, eff. Feb. 27, 1959;

1959, No. 33

, eff. March 11, 1959;

1959, No. 10

7

, § 1, eff. April 10, 1959;

1959, No. 120

, eff. Jan. 1, 1960;

1959, No. 262

, § 35, eff. June 11, 1959;

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, §§ 15, 16, eff. July 11, 1961;

1963, No. 84

,§§ 1, 2;

1963, No. 122

, eff. June 3, 1963;

1965, No. 64

, eff. Jan. 1, 1966;

1967, No. 43

, § 1, eff. March 23, 1967;

1967, No. 184

, eff. April 17, 1967;

1967, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 20, 1968;

1971, No. 77

, § 1, eff. Dec. 31, 1971;

1971, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 74

, § 1, eff. April 14, 1973;

1975, No. 40

;

1977, No. 64

, §§ 1-7, 21, 22;

1979, No. 53

;

1979, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1-5, eff. April 14, 1980;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(b), eff. May 1, 1981;

1981, No. 86

, § 8, eff. May 10, 1981;

1983, No. 16

, §§ 1, 2, 10, 12, eff. April 4, 1983;

1985, No. 50

, §§ 1-3;

1985, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1987, No. 31

, eff. May 8, 1987;

1987, No. 66

;

1987, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.) §§ 1, 3, eff. May 26, 1988; 1991,

1987, No. 82

, § 1; 1991 No. 183 (Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1993, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1997, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 6;

2003, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2005, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 139.

Partnership.

Agreement between dentist and owner of dental clinic in which owner compensated dentist a fixed percentage of fees collected in exchange for dentist’s use of clinic premises, equipment and support staff, but in which dentist did not share in risks or benefits of the business, did not create a partnership or independent contracting agreement exempting owner from characterization as an employer, despite contractual language purporting to create such relationship. Burchesky v. Department of Employment & Training, 154 Vt. 355, 577 A.2d 672, 1989 Vt. LEXIS 277 (1989).

For purposes of this section, office managers of dental clinic working under owner’s control and at owner’s place of business did not have partnership or independent contractor relationship with owner of clinic. Burchesky v. Department of Employment & Training, 154 Vt. 355, 577 A.2d 672, 1989 Vt. LEXIS 277 (1989).